Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.040

Commission created.

(1) There is hereby established a public body corporate and politic, with perpetual corporate succession, to be known as the Washington state housing finance commission. The commission is an instrumentality of the state exercising essential government functions and, for purposes of the code, acts as a constituted authority on behalf of the state when it issues bonds pursuant to this chapter. The commission is a "public body" within the meaning of RCW 39.53.010.

(2) The commission shall consist of the following voting members:

(a) The state treasurer, ex officio;

(b) The director of commerce, ex officio;

(c) An elected local government official, ex officio, with experience in local housing programs, who shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate;

(d) A representative of housing consumer interests, appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate;

(e) A representative of labor interests, appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, after consultation with representatives of organized labor;

(f) A representative of low-income persons, appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate;

(g) Five members of the public appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate, on the basis of geographic distribution and their expertise in housing, real estate, finance, energy efficiency, or construction, one of whom shall be appointed by the governor as chair of the commission and who shall serve on the commission and as chair of the commission at the pleasure of the governor.

The term of the persons appointed by the governor, other than the chair, shall be four years from the date of their appointment, except that the terms of three of the initial appointees shall be for two years from the date of their appointment. The governor shall designate the appointees who will serve the two-year terms. An appointee may be removed by the governor for cause pursuant to RCW 43.06.070 and 43.06.080. The governor shall fill any vacancy in an appointed position by appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term. If the department of commerce is abolished, the resulting vacancy shall be filled by a state official who shall be appointed to the commission by the governor. If this official occupies an office or position for which senate confirmation is not required, then his or her appointment to the commission shall be subject to the consent of the senate. The members of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 and may be reimbursed, solely from the funds of the commission, for expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties under this chapter, subject to the provisions of RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. A majority of the commission constitutes a quorum. Designees shall be appointed in such manner and shall exercise such powers as are specified by the rules of the commission.

(3) The commission may adopt an official seal and may select from its membership a vice chair, a secretary, and a treasurer. The commission shall establish rules concerning its exercise of the powers authorized by this chapter. The rules shall be adopted in conformance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2068; 1995 c 399 s 98; 1985 c 6 s 14; 1984 c 287 s 90; 1983 c 161 s 4.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.